District of Columbia statutes.
3-2705

Repealed

Revocation of license for intoxication.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1887, 24 Stat. 427, ch. 272, § 5
Mar. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 1284, ch. 545
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1238, 46 DCR 3142
1973 Ed., § 2-1505.
1981 Ed., § 2-2405.